Illinois, session 104th, HB5701.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $89,757,700, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Department of Early Childhood to meet its ordinary 8and contingent expenses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 92027. 10    Section 10. The sum of $176,891,900, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 12Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for grants and 13administrative expenses associated with Early Intervention. 14    Section 15. The sum of $28,426,300, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 16Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for grants and 17administrative expenses associated with maternal and child 18home visiting programs, pursuant to Section 15-10 of the 19Department of Early Childhood Act. 20    Section 20. The sum of $650,000, or so much thereof as may   HB5701- 2 -OMB104 00254 HLR 10254 b1be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 2the Department of Early Childhood for grants and 3administrative expenses associated with All Our Kids. 4    Section 25. The sum of $748,138,100, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for the purposes of 7early childhood education. 8    Section 30. The sum of $832,099,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 10Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for income 11assistance and related distributive purposes, including such 12Federal funds as are made available by the Federal Government 13for the following purposes:14  For grants and administrative expenses15   associated with Child Care Services, including16   prior years' costs.............................832,099,000 17    Section 35. The sum of $212,000,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 19Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for grants and 20administrative expenses of the SMART Start Program, in the 21approximate amounts below:22  For SMART Start Workforce Grants................200,000,00023  For SMART Start Quality Contracts................10,000,000  HB5701- 3 -OMB104 00254 HLR 10254 b1  For SMART Start Early Childhood 2   Apprentice Program...............................2,000,000 3    Section 40. The sum of $1,900,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the Off-Hours Child 5Care Program Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for 6costs associated with the Off-Hours Child Care Program Act. 7    Section 45. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary, is appropriated from the Early Intervention 9Services Revolving Fund to the Department of Early Childhood 10for refunds. 11    Section 50. The sum of $275,000,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the Early Intervention 13Services Revolving Fund to the Department of Early Childhood 14for the Early Intervention Services Program, including prior 15years' costs. 16    Section 55. The sum of $2,000,000,000, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Child Care 18Assistance Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for 19grants and administrative expenses associated with the Child 20Care Assistance Program and other childcare related services 21and programs, including prior years' costs.   HB5701- 4 -OMB104 00254 HLR 10254 b1    Section 60. The sum of $2,505,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the DEC Federal Agency 3Services Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for grants 4and administrative expenses associated with maternal and child 5home visiting programs, pursuant to Section 15-10 of the 6Department of Early Childhood Act. 7    Section 65. The sum of $6,200,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the DEC Federal Agency 9Services Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for grants 10and administrative expenses associated with the Great START 11Program. 12    Section 70. The sum of $5,422,400, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the DEC Federal Agency 14Services Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for grants 15and administrative expenses associated with Migrant Child Care 16Services, including prior years' costs. 17    Section 75. The sum of $21,006,800, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the DEC Federal Agency 19Services Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for grants 20and administrative expenses associated with MIEC Home Visiting 21Program. 22    Section 80. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may   HB5701- 5 -OMB104 00254 HLR 10254 b1be necessary, is appropriated from the DEC Federal Agency 2Services Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for grants 3and administrative expenses associated with Head Start State 4Collaboration. 5    Section 85. The sum of $20,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the DEC Special 7Projects Fund to the Department of Early Childhood to be 8expended under the terms and conditions associated with the 9monies being received, including prior years' costs. 10    Section 90. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the DEC Recoveries 12Trust Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for refunds. 13ARTICLE 214    Section 5. The sum of $1,600,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the State Coronavirus 16Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the Department of Early 17Childhood for grants and administration expenses associated 18with Parents Too Soon/Maternal and Child Home Visiting Program 19and Healthy Families, including but not limited to, for 20purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan 21Act of 2021 and related federal guidance, including prior 22years' costs.   HB5701- 6 -OMB104 00254 HLR 10254 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 22026.